Ohio, session 136, HB471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.971 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.971. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, that portion of interstate route two hundred seventy-five, running in an easterly and westerly direction, between mile marker sixty eight and five tenths and mile marker sixty nine and five tenths, within Hamilton county, shall be known as the "Deputy Larry Henderson Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.